Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Chapter 8 Motor Carriers [Renumbered]

Revision of chapter. —

Laws 1983, ch. 140, § 1, repealed the former provisions of this chapter and enacted former §§

37-8-101

through 37-8-104,

37-8-201

through

37-8-206

,

37-8-301

through 37-8-304,

37-8-401

through

37-8-405

and

37-8-501

.

Editor's notes. —

Section 68, ch. 65, Laws 1935, repealed R.S. 1931, §§ 72-501 to 72-537 (ch. 133, Laws 1931), which regulated common carriers.

Section 31, ch. 121, Laws 1937, repealed §§ 2, 4, 5, 8, 9, 13 to 15, 17 to 19, 21 to 28, 31, 34 to 38, 40, 41, 58 to 60, 62 and 65, ch. 65, Laws 1935, but ch. 121 also contained provisions covering most of the subject matter of the repealed sections. Chapter 121 and the unrepealed sections of ch. 65 were combined in this chapter.